Florida, session 2026, HB151.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
456.0145, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
456.0145 Mobile Opportunity by Interstate Licensure
Endorsement (MOBILE) Act.—
(2) LICENSURE BY ENDORSEMENT.—
(c) A person is ineligible for a license under this
section if he or she:
1. Has a complaint, an allegation, or an investigation
pending before a licensing entity in another state, the District
of Columbia, or a possession or territory of the United States;
2. Has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to,
regardless of adjudication, any felony or misdemeanor related to
the practice of a health care profession;
3. Has had a health care provider license revoked or
suspended by another state, the District of Columbia, or a
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb151-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 151 2026
territory of the United States, or has voluntarily surrendered
any such license in lieu of having disciplinary action taken
against the license; or
4. Has not graduated from a dental college or school, or a
dental hygiene college or school, accredited by the American
Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation or its
successor entity, if any, or any other dental or dental hygiene
program accrediting entity recognized by the United States
Department of Education; or
5.4. Has been reported to the National Practitioner Data
Bank, unless the applicant has successfully appealed to have his
or her name removed from the data bank. If the reported adverse
action was a result of conduct that would not constitute a
violation of any law or rule in this state, the board, or the
department if there is no board, may:
a. Approve the application;
b. Approve the application with restrictions on the scope
of practice of the licensee;
c. Approve the application with placement of the licensee
on probation for a period of time and subject to such conditions
as the board, or the department if there is no board, may
specify, including, but not limited to, requiring the applicant
to submit to treatment, attend continuing education courses, or
submit to reexamination; or
d. Deny the application.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb151-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 151 2026
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb151-00